Massachusetts, session 194th, S2232.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1A of chapter 164 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following subsection:-
(h) Notwithstanding any special or general law or regulation to the contrary, an electric
distribution company may construct, own and operate solar energy generation facilities or energy
storage facilities on federal military lands if the costs of such facilities are not funded by or
recovered from the electric distribution company’s ratepayers. Such projects shall not be
required to receive approval from the department.
Federal military installations within the commonwealth shall not be subject to renewable
energy production caps or net metering limitations for each individual installation.
of 1